Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-1,131
Offender; granted a reprieve; commit to Department of Correctional Services.

An offender who has been granted a reprieve may be committed by the Board of Pardons to the Department of Correctional Services. The costs of transporting the offender to the department shall be allowed and paid by the state.

Laws 1969, c. 817, § 62, p. 3104.